Hawaii, session 2026, HB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a need for clear regulations regarding the interaction between surfers and fishermen in Hawaii.  Fishermen often deploy fishing lines in a manner that crosses the surfing lane and poses a significant safety hazard to surfers and other ocean users. The purpose of this Act is to ensure the safety of all ocean users and prioritize the rights of surfers in designated surf locations. SECTION 2.  Chapter 188, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§188-    Surfer right of way.  (a)  Surfers shall have the right of way in designated surf locations.  Fishermen, including drone fishermen, are required to move their fishing poles or lines if they interfere with surfers or other recreational users. (b)  Any person violating this section or any rule adopted pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined: (1)  $500 for the first offense; (2)  $1,500 for the second offense; and (3)  $3,000 for a third or subsequent offense. (c)  In addition to any other penalty imposed under this section, a person violating this section shall be subject to: (1)  For a first offense, seizure of any fishing equipment used in violation of this section or any rule adopted pursuant to this section; and (2)  For a second offense, seizure and forfeiture of any fishing equipment used in violation of this section or any rule adopted pursuant to this section. (d)  The prosecution of any violation under this section or any rule adopted pursuant to this section requires sufficient evidence to demonstrate the unsafe conditions and the disregard for surfers' rights. (e)  The department shall implement a public education campaign to inform both surfers and fishermen about their rights and responsibilities in shared ocean spaces. (f)  The department shall install clear signage at designated surf locations indicating surfers' right of way and the rules pertaining to fishing in that area.  The department shall publish a map identifying all designated surf locations. (g)  This section may be enforced by the department's division of conservation and resource enforcement, the department of law enforcement, the respective county police departments, or the respective county fire departments. (h)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary for the purpose of this section. (i)  As used in this section: "Drone fishermen" means individuals using drones to deploy fishing lines in proximity to recreational ocean users. "Surfers" means individuals engaged in surfing at designated surf locations. "Designated surf location" means an area recognized as safe and common locations for surfing, swimming, diving, and other recreational activities, to be determined by the department of land and natural resources. "Department" means the department of land and natural resources. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________